District of Columbia statutes.
42-3508.05

Distressed property improvement plan.

(a)

Upon petition by the housing provider, the Mayor may initiate the development of a distressed property improvement plan utilizing any or all of the mechanisms in § 42-3508.04(b). The development of the plan shall involve the participation of the housing provider, the tenants or tenants’ association and may include the mortgagor.

(b)

A distressed property improvement plan may include, but not be limited to:

(1)

A schedule of repairs and capital improvements;

(2)

A schedule of services and facilities;

(3)

A schedule of rents and rent increases;

(4)

A schedule of mortgage payments which may reflect additional long-term loans to the housing provider for the housing accommodation;

(5)

A schedule of additional capital investment in the housing accommodation by the housing provider; and

(6)

A schedule of property tax payments, which may also reflect moratoria or deferrals on property tax payments and the abatement or deferral of up to 100% of any tax outstanding on the housing accommodation.

(c)

In the development of the distressed property improvement plan, the Mayor may consider:

(1)

The interests of tenants in achieving decent, safe, and sanitary housing at affordable rents;

(2)

The long-term interest of the housing provider in achieving a sound investment and a reasonable return on the housing provider’s investment;

(3)

The long-term interest of the mortgagor in achieving a financially secure mortgage; and

(4)

The long-term interest of the District in achieving a decent, safe, and sanitary housing accommodation which is fiscally sound and which generates and pays its fair property tax assessment.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 805, 32 DCR 3089

History

1981 Ed., § 45-2585.

Prior Codifications

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3508.01.

Expiration of Law